Massachusetts, session 194th, S377.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1E of chapter 15 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended, by striking out the second and third sentences of the first paragraph and
inserting in place thereof the following:-
The 9 members appointed by the governor shall consist of 1 representative of a labor
organization selected by the governor from a list of 3 nominees provided by the Massachusetts
State Labor Council, AFL-CIO; 1 representative of business and industry selected by the
governor with a demonstrated commitment to education; 1 representative of parents of school
children selected by the governor from a list of 3 nominees provided by the Massachusetts
Parent Teachers Association; 2 representatives of teachers, 1 selected by the governor from a list
of 3 nominees offered by the Massachusetts Teachers Association, and 1 selected by the
of 2

governor from a list of 3 nominees offered by the American Federation of
Teachers/Massachusetts; 1 school committee member selected by the governor from a list of 3
nominees provided by the Massachusetts Association of School Committees, and 4 additional
members.
of 2